Missouri, session 2026, SB1131.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.115, 137.750, 138.380, 138.390,
138.410, and 138.435, RSMo, are repealed and six new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 137.115,
137.750, 138.380, 138.390, 138.410, and 138.435, to read as
follows:
137.115. 1. All other laws to the contrary
notwithstanding, the assessor or the assessor's deputies in
all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis
shall annually make a list of all real and tangible personal
property taxable in the assessor's city, county, town or
district. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
this section and section 137.078, the assessor shall
annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and
one-third percent of its true value in money as of January
first of each calendar year. The assessor shall annually
assess all real property, including any new construction and
improvements to real property, and possessory interests in
real property at the percent of its true value in money set
in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in money of
any possessory interest in real property in subclass (3),
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1131 2
where such real property is on or lies within the ultimate
airport boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan,
as defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a commercial airport having a
FAR Part 139 certification and owned by a political
subdivision, shall be the otherwise applicable true value in
money of any such possessory interest in real property, less
the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party, other than
the political subdivision, towards any new construction or
improvements on such real property completed after January
1, 2008, and which are included in the above-mentioned
possessory interest, regardless of the year in which such
costs were incurred or whether such costs were considered in
any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all real
property in the following manner: new assessed values shall
be determined as of January first of each odd-numbered year
and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same
assessed values shall apply in the following even-numbered
year, except for new construction and property improvements
which shall be valued as though they had been completed as
of January first of the preceding odd-numbered year. The
assessor may call at the office, place of doing business, or
residence of each person required by this chapter to list
property, and require the person to make a correct statement
of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
person or under his or her care, charge or management,
taxable in the county. On or before January first of each
even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a
two-year assessment maintenance plan to the county governing
body and the state tax commission for their respective
approval or modification. The county governing body shall
approve and forward such plan or its alternative to the plan
to the state tax commission by February first. If the

SB 1131 3
county governing body fails to forward the plan or its
alternative to the plan to the state tax commission by
February first, the assessor's plan shall be considered
approved by the county governing body. [If the state tax
commission fails to approve a plan and if the state tax
commission and the assessor and the governing body of the
county involved are unable to resolve the differences, in
order to receive state cost-share funds outlined in section
137.750, the county or the assessor shall petition the
administrative hearing commission, by May first, to decide
all matters in dispute regarding the assessment maintenance
plan. Upon agreement of the parties, the matter may be
stayed while the parties proceed with mediation or
arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final
decision of the administrative hearing commission shall be
subject to judicial review in the circuit court of the
county involved.] In the event a valuation of subclass (1)
real property within any county with a charter form of
government, or within a city not within a county, is made by
a computer, computer-assisted method or a computer program,
the burden of proof, supported by clear, convincing and
cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the
assessor at any hearing or appeal. In any such county,
unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a
presumption that the assessment was made by a computer,
computer-assisted method or a computer program. Such
evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
following:
(1) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal
of the property by generally accepted appraisal techniques;
and

SB 1131 4
(2) The purchase prices from sales of at least three
comparable properties and the address or location thereof.
As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means
that:
(a) Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the
property valuation; and
(b) Such properties are not more than one mile from
the site of the disputed property, except where no similar
properties exist within one mile of the disputed property,
the nearest comparable property shall be used. Such
property shall be within five hundred square feet in size of
the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in
age, floor plan, number of rooms, and other relevant
characteristics.
2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City
of St. Louis may send personal property assessment forms
through the mail.
3. The following items of personal property shall each
constitute separate subclasses of tangible personal property
and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of
taxation at the following percentages of their true value in
100 money:
101 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an
102 unmanufactured condition, one-half of one percent;
103 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
104 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
105 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration
106 as and are registered as historic motor vehicles pursuant to
107 section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five
108 years old and which are used solely for noncommercial
109 purposes and are operated less than two hundred hours per

SB 1131 5
110 year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five
111 percent;
112 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;
113 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and
114 tools and equipment used in retooling for the purpose of
115 introducing new product lines or used for making
116 improvements to existing products by any company which is
117 located in a state enterprise zone and which is identified
118 by any standard industrial classification number cited in
119 subdivision (7) of section 135.200, twenty-five percent; and
120 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
121 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
122 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
123 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of
124 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
125 energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
126 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true
127 and correct statement of the property, in a printed blank
128 prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being
129 filled out, shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to
130 as provided in section 137.155. The list shall then be
131 delivered to the assessor.
132 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such
133 subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X of
134 the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
135 shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value:
136 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen
137 percent;
138 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent;
139 and
140 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two
141 percent.

SB 1131 6
142 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or,
143 if not located within a county, then the assessor of such
144 city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real
145 property if the use or purpose of such real property is
146 changed after such property is assessed under the provisions
147 of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such
148 property shall be reclassified, he or she shall determine
149 the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage
150 of the tax year that such property was classified in each
151 subclassification.
152 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
153 which are actually used as dwelling units shall be assessed
154 at the same percentage of true value as residential real
155 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of
156 assessment of true value for such manufactured homes shall
157 be the same as for residential real property. If the county
158 collector cannot identify or find the manufactured home when
159 attempting to attach the manufactured home for payment of
160 taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county
161 collector may request the county commission to have the
162 manufactured home removed from the tax books, and such
163 request shall be granted within thirty days after the
164 request is made; however, the removal from the tax books
165 does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it
166 is later identified or found. For purposes of this section,
167 a manufactured home located in a manufactured home rental
168 park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
169 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal
170 property. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home
171 located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
172 may be considered real property.

SB 1131 7
173 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered
174 a parcel for the purpose of reimbursement pursuant to
175 section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to
176 be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015
177 and assessed as a realty improvement to the existing real
178 estate parcel.
179 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the
180 assessment of a manufactured home shall be included on the
181 personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
182 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real
183 estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015, in
184 which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment
185 of the manufactured home as a realty improvement to the
186 existing real estate parcel shall be included on the real
187 property tax statement of the real estate owner.
188 9. The assessor of each county and each city not
189 within a county shall use a nationally recognized automotive
190 trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
191 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book,
192 Edmunds, or other similar publication as the recommended
193 guide of information for determining the true value of motor
194 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax
195 commission shall select and make available to all assessors
196 which publication shall be used. The assessor of each
197 county and each city not within a county shall use the trade-
198 in value published in the current October issue of the
199 publication selected by the state tax commission. The
200 assessor shall not use a value that is greater than the
201 average trade-in value in determining the true value of the
202 motor vehicle without performing a physical inspection of
203 the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years old or newer from
204 a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other

SB 1131 8
205 than average without performing a physical inspection of the
206 motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for a particular
207 motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use
208 such information or publications that, in the assessor's
209 judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
210 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of
211 less than fifty thousand dollars as of January 1, 2025, the
212 assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount
213 greater than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous
214 year, provided that such motor vehicle was properly assessed
215 in the previous year.
216 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed
217 valuation of any parcel of subclass (1) real property by
218 more than fifteen percent since the last assessment,
219 excluding increases due to new construction or improvements,
220 the assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of such
221 property.
222 11. If a physical inspection is required, pursuant to
223 subsection 10 of this section, the assessor shall notify the
224 property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide the
225 owner clear written notice of the owner's rights relating to
226 the physical inspection. If a physical inspection is
227 required, the property owner may request that an interior
228 inspection be performed during the physical inspection. The
229 owner shall have no less than thirty days to notify the
230 assessor of a request for an interior physical inspection.
231 12. A physical inspection, as required by subsection
232 10 of this section, shall include, but not be limited to, an
233 on-site personal observation and review of all exterior
234 portions of the land and any buildings and improvements to
235 which the inspector has or may reasonably and lawfully gain
236 external access, and shall include an observation and review

SB 1131 9
237 of the interior of any buildings or improvements on the
238 property upon the timely request of the owner pursuant to
239 subsection 11 of this section. Mere observation of the
240 property via a drive-by inspection or the like shall not be
241 considered sufficient to constitute a physical inspection as
242 required by this section.
243 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards
244 as proper form of payment of outstanding property tax or
245 license due. No county or city collector may charge
246 surcharge for payment by credit card which exceeds the fee
247 or surcharge charged by the credit card bank, processor, or
248 issuer for its service. A county or city collector may
249 accept payment by electronic transfers of funds in payment
250 of any tax or license and charge the person making such
251 payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the
252 bank, processor, or issuer of such electronic payment.
253 14. Any county or city not within a county in this
254 state may, by an affirmative vote of the governing body of
255 such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and
256 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house
257 bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly, second
258 regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
259 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate
260 committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-second
261 general assembly, second regular session, for the next year
262 of the general reassessment, prior to January first of any
263 year. No county or city not within a county shall exercise
264 this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of
265 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
266 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
267 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as
268 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute

SB 1131 10
269 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
270 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a
271 year of general reassessment. For the purposes of applying
272 the provisions of this subsection, a political subdivision
273 contained within two or more counties where at least one of
274 such counties has opted out and at least one of such
275 counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate
276 as in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150
277 of the ninety-first general assembly, second regular
278 session. A governing body of a city not within a county or
279 a county that has opted out under the provisions of this
280 subsection may choose to implement the provisions of this
281 section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
282 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
283 assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as
284 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
285 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
286 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for
287 the next year of general reassessment, by an affirmative
288 vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
289 any year.
290 15. The governing body of any city of the third
291 classification with more than twenty-six thousand three
292 hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred
293 inhabitants located in any county that has exercised its
294 authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this section may
295 levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal
296 property only if such city bills and collects its own
297 property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing
298 and collection of such separate and differing tax rates.
299 Such separate and differing rates shall not exceed such
300 city's tax rate ceiling.

SB 1131 11
301 16. Any portion of real property that is available as
302 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
303 purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that
304 has not been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be
305 assessed based upon how the real property is currently being
306 used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state
307 tax commission, state agency, or political subdivision
308 responsible for the administration of tax policies shall, in
309 the performance of its duties, make available all books,
310 records, and information requested, except such books,
311 records, and information as are by law declared confidential
312 in nature, including individually identifiable information
313 regarding a specific taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property.
314 For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall mean
315 all real property that is in use or readily available as a
316 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
317 purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to
318 others that has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
137.750. 1. [If a county has an assessment
maintenance plan approved pursuant to section 137.115,] A
portion of all the costs and expenses of the assessor of
each county and each city not within a county, incurred for
the current quarter in performing all duties necessary to
assess and maintain equalized assessed valuations of real
property, making real and personal property assessments and
preparing abstracts of assessment lists, shall be reimbursed
by the state. The state shall reimburse up to sixty percent
of all the current and past unreported quarterly costs and
expenses of the assessor of each county and each city not
within a county based on compliance with the state tax
commission approved assessment and equalization maintenance
plan. Except as provided in section 138.435, the state

SB 1131 12
shall reimburse each eligible county a minimum of three
dollars per parcel for up to twenty thousand parcels, but no
further reimbursements shall be made until the county has
expended at least two-thirds of that amount of money for
assessment maintenance from its assessment fund. The annual
state reimbursement to any county pursuant to this section
in 2000 shall not exceed seven dollars per parcel of real
property in the county and each year thereafter such maximum
amount may be increased by up to three percent, but the
amount reimbursed by the state shall not exceed sixty
percent of the actual costs and expenses incurred, except
that counties entitled to only the three-dollar per parcel
minimum shall receive one-fourth of the state's contribution
each quarter.
2. The governing body of each county and city not
within a county which seeks or will seek reimbursement under
any provision of this section or section 137.720 shall
establish a fund to be known as the "Assessment Fund", to be
used solely as a depository for funds received by the county
or city pursuant to this section and sections 137.037 and
137.720, from the general revenue fund of the county or
other sources for the purpose of funding the costs and
expenses incurred in implementing an assessment and
equalization maintenance plan [approved under section
137.115] and for assessing real and personal property.
3. All counties and cities not within a county seeking
state funds under this section shall submit a certified copy
of their costs and expenses to the commissioner of the
office of administration not later than the thirtieth day of
the quarter immediately following the quarter for which such
state funds are sought. The commissioner of the office of
administration [shall, in such form as may be prescribed by

SB 1131 13
rule, certify that the county requests for reimbursement are
consistent with the assessment and equalization maintenance
plan approved by the state tax commission as provided in
section 137.115, and] shall pay the state's share out of
funds appropriated for that purpose quarterly to each
eligible county and city to reimburse such county or city
for reimbursable costs and expenses incurred in the previous
calendar quarter.
4. (1) The following costs and expenses shall not
qualify for state reimbursement or reimbursement from tax
moneys withheld from political subdivisions:
(a) Premiums for property and casualty insurance and
liability insurance;
(b) Depreciation, interest, building and ground
maintenance, fuel and utility costs, and other indirect
expenses which can be classified as the overhead expenses of
the assessor's office;
(c) Purchases of motor vehicles;
(2) Costs and expenses which shall qualify for state
reimbursement, but only if identified in the county
maintenance plan and subsequently specifically approved by
the state tax commission, shall include:
(a) Salaries and benefits of data processing and legal
personnel not directly employed by the assessor;
(b) Costs and expenses for computer software,
hardware, and maintenance;
(c) Costs and expenses of any additional office space
made necessary in order to carry out the county's
maintenance plan;
(d) Costs of leased equipment;
(e) Costs of aerial photography.

SB 1131 14
138.380. 1. It shall be the duty of the state tax
commission, and the commissioners shall have authority, to
perform all duties enumerated in this section and such other
duties as may be provided by law:
(1) To raise or lower the assessed valuation of any
parcel or item of real or tangible personal property,
including the power to raise or lower the assessed valuation
of the real or tangible personal property of any individual,
copartnership, company, association or corporation;
provided, that before any such assessment is so raised,
notice of the intention of the commission to raise such
assessed valuation and of the time and place at which a
hearing thereon will be held, shall be given to such
individual, copartnership, company, association or
corporation as provided in sections 138.460 and 138.470, and
further provided that the commission shall not have the
power to require a county to raise or lower the assessed
valuation of an entire class or subclass of property;
(2) To require from any officer in this state, on
forms prescribed by the commission, such annual or other
reports as shall enable said commission to ascertain the
assessed and equalized value of all real and tangible
property listed for taxation, the amount of taxes assessed,
collected and returned, and such other matter as the
commission may require, to the end that it may have complete
information concerning the entire subject of revenue and
taxation and all matters and things incidental thereto;
(3) To cause to be placed upon the assessment rolls at
any time during the year omitted property which may be
discovered to have, for any reason, escaped assessment and
taxation, and to correct any errors that may be found on the

SB 1131 15
assessment rolls and to cause the proper entry to be made
thereon;
(4) To investigate the tax laws of other states and
countries, to formulate and submit to the legislature such
recommendations as the commission may deem expedient to
prevent evasions of the assessment and taxing laws, whether
the tax is specific or general, to secure just, equal and
uniform taxes, and improve the system of assessment and
taxation in this state;
(5) To prescribe the form of all blanks and books that
are used in the assessment and collection of the general
property tax, except as otherwise provided by law; and
(6) To develop, or enter into contracts with entities
for the development of, computer software programs
sufficient to produce the projected tax liability notices
required under subsections 2 and 3 of section 137.180,
subsection 2 of section 137.355, and subsection 2 of section
137.490. Upon receiving a request, before December 31,
2009, filed by a collector of any county or any city not
within the county, the commission shall provide the
collector with such computer software programs.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the commission shall not utilize the standards
promulgated by the International Association of Assessing
Officers (IAAO) or any other international or domestic
organization to carry out any powers and duties prescribed
in this chapter.
138.390. 1. The state tax commission shall equalize
the valuation of real and tangible personal property among
the several counties in the state in the following manner:
with the abstracts of all the taxable property in the
several counties of the state and the abstracts of the sales

SB 1131 16
of real estate in such counties as returned by the
respective county clerks and the assessor of the city of St.
Louis, the commission shall classify all real estate situate
in cities, towns, and villages, as town lots, and all other
real estate as farming lands, and shall classify all
tangible personal property as follows: banking
corporations, railroad corporations, street railroad
corporations, all other corporations, horses, mares and
geldings, mules, asses and jennets, neat cattle, sheep,
swine, goats, domesticated small animals and all other
livestock, poultry, power machinery, farm implements, other
tangible personal property.
2. (1) The state tax commission shall equalize the
valuation of each class or subclass of property thereof
among the respective counties of the state in the following
manner:
[(1)] (a) It shall add to the valuation of each class,
subclass, or portion thereof of the property, real or
tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be
valued below its real value in money such amount or percent
as will increase the same in each case to its true value;
[(2)] (b) It shall deduct from the valuation of each
class, subclass, or portion thereof of the property, real or
tangible personal, of each county which it believes to be
valued above its real value in money such amount or percent
as will reduce the same in each case to its true value.
(2) (a) For the purposes of this subsection, the
state tax commission shall utilize ratio studies to
determine whether a class or subclass of property is valued
below or above its true value in money.
(b) A class or subclass of property shall be
considered to be valued below its true value in money if:

SB 1131 17
a. The weighted median ratio is less than seventy
percent and the coefficient of dispersion is greater than
twenty-five percent; or
b. The weighted median ratio is less than seventy
percent and the upper bound of the ninety-five percent
confidence interval for the weighted median is less than
seventy percent.
(c) A class or subclass of property shall be
considered to be valued above its true value in money if:
a. The weighted median ratio is greater than one
hundred percent and the coefficient of dispersion is greater
than twenty-five percent; or
b. The weighted median ratio is greater than one
hundred percent and the upper bound of the ninety-five
percent confidence interval for the weighted median is
greater than one hundred percent.
138.410. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of
this section, the commission shall exercise general
supervision over all the assessing officers of this state,
over county boards of equalization and appeal in the
performance of their duties under this chapter and all other
laws concerning the general property tax and shall institute
proper proceedings to enforce the penalties and liabilities
provided by law for public officers, officers of
corporations and individuals failing to comply with the
provisions of this chapter, and of all laws relating to the
general property tax.
2. [In the execution of these powers the said
commission shall call upon the attorney general or any
prosecuting or circuit attorney in the state, to assist this
commission in the enforcement of laws with the supervision
of which this commission is charged, and when so called upon

SB 1131 18
it shall be the duty of the attorney general, and the
prosecuting or circuit attorneys in their respective
counties, to assist in the commencement and prosecutions of
actions and proceedings for penalties, forfeitures, removals
and punishments for violation of the laws in respect to the
assessment and taxation of property, and to represent the
commission in any litigation which it may wish to institute
or in which it may become involved in the discharge of its
duties] The commission shall exercise a general advisory
role over all assessing officers of the state for the
purposes of equalizing assessments as between counties, and
the commission shall not have the power to require counties
to enter into any agreement or memorandum of understanding
for the purpose of increasing or decreasing the assessed
valuation of an entire class or subclass of property, or of
any portion thereof other than through an appeal of a
decision made by a county board of equalization.
138.435. 1. There is hereby established within the
state tax commission the "Office of State Ombudsman for
Property Assessment and Taxation" for the purpose of helping
to assure the fairness, accountability, and transparency of
the property tax process.
2. The office shall be administered by the state
ombudsman, who shall devote his or her entire time to the
duties of the position.
3. The office shall establish and implement procedures
for receiving, processing, responding to, and resolving
complaints made by or on behalf of taxpayers relating to
assessments, valuation of property, tax levies of political
subdivisions, and appeals before the assessor, board of
equalization, or the state tax commission.

SB 1131 19
4. The ombudsman or representatives of the office
shall have the authority to:
(1) Investigate any complaints or inquiries that come
to the attention of the office. The ombudsman shall have
access to review taxpayer records, if given permission by
the taxpayer or the taxpayer's legal guardian. Taxpayers
shall have the right to request, deny, or terminate any
assistance that the ombudsman may provide;
(2) Make the necessary inquiries and review of such
information and records as the ombudsman or representative
of the office deems necessary to accomplish the objective of
verifying these complaints.
5. The office shall acknowledge complaints, report its
findings, make recommendations, gather and disseminate
information and other material, and publicize its existence.
6. The ombudsman may recommend to the relevant state
or local governmental agency or political subdivision
changes in the rules and regulations adopted or proposed by
such governmental agency or political subdivision which do
or may adversely affect the rights or privileges of
taxpayers. The office shall analyze and monitor the
development and implementation of federal, state and local
laws, regulations, and policies with respect to property
assessment and taxation, and shall recommend to the state
tax commission changes in such laws, regulations, and
policies deemed by the office to be appropriate.
7. The office shall promote community contact and
involvement with taxpayers through the use of volunteers and
volunteer programs to encourage citizen involvement in the
property tax process.
8. The office shall prepare and distribute to each
county written notices which set forth the address,

SB 1131 20
telephone number, and email address of the office, a brief
explanation of the function of the office, the procedure to
follow in filing a complaint, and other pertinent
information.
9. The county shall ensure that such written notice is
available upon request of any taxpayer.
10. The office shall inform taxpayers or their legal
guardians of their rights and entitlements by means of the
distribution of educational materials and group meetings.
11. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "State Ombudsman for Property Tax Fund", which shall
consist of moneys as provided in this subsection. The state
treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance
with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund
and money in the fund shall be used solely by the state tax
commission to fund the office of state ombudsman for
property assessment and taxation. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not
revert to the credit of the general revenue fund. The state
treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner
as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned
on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
(2) If in any given fiscal year the annual
appropriation made to the state tax commission from the
general assembly is insufficient to fund the office of the
state ombudsman for property assessment and taxation, the
state tax commission shall determine the amount of the
insufficiency and an equal portion of the state
reimbursement made to each county assessment fund pursuant
to section 137.750 shall instead be deposited in the state

SB 1131 21
ombudsman for property tax fund such that the amount
deposited is equal to the amount of the insufficiency.
✓